Arkansas, session 2025, SB405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-119-102(3), concerning the definition of
"online marketplace" used under the Online Marketplace Consumer Inform Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(3) "Online marketplace" means any electronically based or
electronically accessed consumer-directed platform that:
(A) Includes features that allow for, facilitate, or
enable third-party sellers to engage in the sale, purchase, payment, storage,
shipping, or delivery of a consumer product in the United States; and
(B) Hosts one (1) or more third-party sellers;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-119-102(6), concerning the definition of
"verify" used under the Online Marketplace Consumer Inform Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(6) "Verify" means to confirm information provided to an online
marketplace under § 4-119-103 by the use of:
(A) A third-party or proprietary identity verification
system that has the capability to confirm a seller's name, email address,
physical address, and telephone number; or
*ANS284*
03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284

SB405
(B) A combination of two-factor authentication, public
records search, and the presentation of a government-issued identification
one (1) or more reliable methods that enable the online marketplace to
determine that any information and documents provided are:
(A) Valid;
(B) Corresponding to the seller or an individual acting on
behalf of the seller; and
(C) Not misappropriated or falsified.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-119-103 is amended to read as follows:
4-119-103. Online marketplace — Verification required.
(a) An online marketplace shall require a high-volume third-party
seller to provide to the online marketplace within twenty-four (24) hours
within ten (10) days of becoming a high-volume third-party seller:
(1)(A)(i) Bank account information, the accuracy of which has
been confirmed directly by the online marketplace, a payment processor, or
other third party contracted by the online marketplace.
(ii) If the high-volume third-party seller does not
have a bank account, then the name of the payee for payments issued by the
online marketplace to the high-volume third-party seller.
(B) The bank account information or payee information
described in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) or subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of this
section may be provided by the high-volume third-party seller:
(i) To the online marketplace; or
(ii) To a payment processor or other third party
contracted by the online marketplace to maintain the information, provided
that the online marketplace may obtain the information on demand within three
(3) business days from the payment processor or other third party contracted
by the online marketplace;
(2)(A) Contact information for the high-volume third-party
seller.
(B) As used in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section,
“contact information” includes:
(i) If the high-volume third-party seller is an
individual, a copy of a government-issued photo identification for the
individual high-volume third-party seller that includes the high-volume
03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284

SB405
third-party seller's name and physical address the individual's name;
(ii) If the high-volume third-party seller is not an
individual, then:
(a) A copy of a government-issued photo
identification for an individual acting on behalf of the high-volume third-
party seller that includes the individual's name and physical address; or
(b) A copy of a government-issued record or
tax document that includes the business name and physical address of the
high-volume third-party seller; and
(iii) A working email address and working telephone
number for the high-volume third-party seller; and
(3) A business tax identification number or, if the high-volume
third-party seller does not have a business tax identification number, a
taxpayer identification number; and
(4) Whether or not the high-volume third-party seller:
(A) Is exclusively advertising or offering a consumer
product on the online marketplace; and
(B) Is currently advertising or offering for sale the same
consumer product or products on any other internet websites other than the
online marketplace.
(b)(1) An online marketplace shall verify:
(A) The information provided in subsection (a) of this
section within three (3) ten (10) days; and
(B) Any changes to the information described in subsection
(a) of this section within three (3) ten (10) days of receipt of any changes
to the information that is provided to the online marketplace by a high-
volume third-party seller.
(2) If a high-volume third-party seller provides a copy of a
valid government-issued tax document, then the information contained within
the tax document shall be presumed to be verified as of the date of issuance
of the record or document.
(3)(A) An online marketplace shall, at least annually:
(i) Notify each high-volume third-party seller
operating on the online marketplace that the high-volume third-party seller
shall inform the online marketplace of any changes to the information
provided by the high-volume third-party seller under subsection (a) of this
03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284

SB405
section within three (3) ten (10) days of receiving the notification; and
(ii) Instruct each high-volume third-party seller,
as part of the notification, to electronically certify either that the high-
volume third-party seller's information is unchanged or that the high-volume
third-party seller is providing changes to the information described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(B) If the online marketplace becomes aware that a high-
volume third-party seller has not certified that the high-volume third-party
seller's information is unchanged or has not provided the changed information
within three (3) ten (10) days of receiving the notification, then the online
marketplace shall suspend the high-volume third-party seller's participation
on the online marketplace until the high-volume third-party seller either
certifies that the high-volume third-party seller's information is unchanged
or provides the information that has changed and the information is verified.
(c) An online marketplace shall require a high-volume third-party
seller in with an aggregate total of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or
more in annual gross revenues on the online marketplace to provide and
disclose to consumers in a conspicuous manner and in bold print on the
product listing or, for information other than the high-volume third-party
seller's full name, through a conspicuously placed link on the listing of the
consumer product listing including through a hyperlink, in the order
confirmation message, or other document or communication made to the consumer
after the purchase is finalized and in the consumer's account transaction
history:
(1) The identity of the high-volume third-party seller that
shall include:
(A) The full name of the high-volume third-party seller
that may include without limitation the seller's name or seller's company
name or the name by which the seller or the seller's company operates on the
online marketplace;
(B) The full physical address of the high-volume third-
party seller; and
(C)(i) Whether the high-volume third-party seller also
engages in the manufacturing, importing, or reselling of consumer products;
and
(D)(i) Contact information for the high-volume third-party
03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284

SB405
seller, including a working telephone number, and working email address, or
other means of direct electronic messaging that may be provided to the seller
by the online marketplace, if the requirements of this item do not prevent an
online marketplace from monitoring the communications between a high-volume
third party seller and a user of the online marketplace for potential fraud,
abuse, or spam.
(ii) The working email address required under
subdivision (c)(1)(D)(i) (c)(1)(C)(i) of this section may be provided to the
high-volume third-party seller through the online marketplace if assigned to
the high-volume third-party seller; and
(2) Any other information determined to be necessary to address
circumvention or evasion of the requirements of this chapter if the
additional information is limited to what is necessary to address such
circumvention or evasion.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, upon the
request of a high-volume third-party seller, an online marketplace may
provide for partial disclosure of the identifying information required under
subsection (c) of this section if:
(1) The high-volume third-party seller demonstrates to the
online marketplace that the high-volume third-party seller does not have a
business address and only has a residential street address, the online
marketplace may:
(A) Direct the high-volume third-party seller to disclose
only the country and, if applicable, the state in which the high-volume
third-party seller resides on the listing of the consumer product;
(B) Inform a consumer that there is no business address
available for the high-volume third-party seller; and
(C) Inform a consumer that any consumer inquiries should
be submitted to the high-volume third-party seller by telephone or email;
(2) The high-volume third-party seller demonstrates to the
online marketplace that the seller is a business that has a physical address
for consumer product returns, then the online marketplace may direct the
high-volume third-party seller to disclose the high-volume third-party
seller's physical address for consumer product returns; or
(3) A high-volume third-party seller demonstrates to the online
marketplace that the high-volume third-party seller only has a personal
03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284

SB405
telephone number, the online marketplace shall inform consumers that there is
no telephone number available for the high-volume third-party seller and that
any consumer inquiries should be submitted to the high-volume third-party
seller's email address.
(e) If an online marketplace becomes aware that a high-volume third-
party seller has made a false representation to the online marketplace in
order to justify the provision of a partial disclosure under subsection (d)
of this section or that a high-volume third-party seller who has requested
and received a provision for a partial disclosure under subsection (d) of
this section has not provided responsive answers within a reasonable time
frame to consumer inquiries submitted to the high-volume third-party seller
by telephone or email address, then the online marketplace shall withdraw its
provision for partial disclosure and require full disclosure of the high-
volume third-party seller's identity information required under subsection
(c) of this section within three (3) ten (10) business days' notice to the
high-volume third-party seller.
(f) An online marketplace shall disclose to a consumer, in a
conspicuous manner and in bold print on the consumer product listing of any
high-volume third-party seller, a reporting mechanism that allows for
electronic and telephonic reporting of suspicious marketplace activity to the
online marketplace and a message encouraging individuals seeking goods for
purchase to report suspicious activity to the online marketplace.
(g) In addition to the requirements of subsection (f) of this section,
an online marketplace that warehouses, distributes, or otherwise fulfills a
consumer product order shall disclose to the consumer the identification of
any high-volume third-party seller supplying the consumer product if
different than the seller listed on the product listing page.









03/07/2025 8:00:41 AM ANS284